Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF6.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1793XS (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. 6 Section 1. Section 139A.8, subsection 4, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. Information regarding exemptions and 3 the requirements for an exemption under this subsection 4 shall be included in any public communication following the 5 recommendation of an immunization by the department pursuant to 6 subsection 2, shall be included in any communication regarding 7 immunizations to a parent or legal guardian from a school, 8 and shall be published on the internet sites of and included 9 in registration documentation for all elementary schools, 10 secondary schools, and licensed child care centers. 11 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 237A.3C Immunization information. 12 Each child care center, child care facility, child care 13 home, and child development home shall include information 14 regarding the exemptions and requirements for an exemption 15 described in section 139A.8, subsection 4, in any communication 16 to the parent or guardian of a child that is related to the 17 immunizations required under section 139A.8. 18 Sec. 3. Section 256.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 19 following new subsection: 20 NEW SUBSECTION . 15. Adopt rules under chapter 17A that 21 require school districts, accredited nonpublic schools, charter 22 schools, and innovation zone schools to include information 23 regarding the exemptions and requirements for an exemption 24 described in section 139A.8, subsection 4, in any communication 25 to the parent or guardian of a student that is related to the 26 immunizations required under section 139A.8. 27 Sec. 4. Section 256.183, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 28 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 29 âAccredited private institutionâ means an institution of 30 higher learning located in Iowa which is operated privately 31 and not controlled or administered by any state agency or 32 any subdivision of the state and which meets the criteria in 33 paragraphs âaâ and âbâ and all of the criteria in paragraphs âdâ 34 through âjâ âkâ , except that institutions defined in paragraph 35 -1- LSB 1793XS (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 4 S.F. 6 âcâ of this subsection are exempt from the requirements of 1 paragraphs âaâ and âbâ : 2 Sec. 5. Section 256.183, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 3 by adding the following new paragraph: 4 NEW PARAGRAPH . k. Adopts a policy that requires the 5 institution to include in any communication to students that 6 is related to immunization requirements information regarding 7 exemptions to such requirements. 8 Sec. 6. Section 256.183, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 9 to read as follows: 10 3. âEligible institutionâ means an institution of higher 11 learning located in Iowa which is operated privately and 12 not controlled or administered by any state agency or any 13 subdivision of the state, which is not exempt from taxation 14 under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and which 15 meets all of the criteria in subsection 1 , paragraphs âdâ 16 through âjâ âkâ , and is a school of barbering and cosmetology 17 arts and sciences licensed under chapter 157 and is accredited 18 by a national accrediting agency recognized by the United 19 States department of education. For the fiscal year beginning 20 July 1, 2017, such a school of barbering and cosmetology arts 21 and sciences shall provide a matching aggregate amount of 22 institutional financial aid equal to at least seventy-five 23 percent of the amount received by the institutionâs students 24 for Iowa tuition grant assistance under section 256.191 . For 25 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2018, the school of barbering 26 and cosmetology arts and sciences shall provide a matching 27 aggregate amount of institutional financial aid equal to at 28 least eighty-five percent of the amount received in that fiscal 29 year. Commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2019, 30 and each succeeding fiscal year, the matching aggregate amount 31 of institutional financial aid shall be at least equal to the 32 match provided by eligible institutions under section 261.9, 33 subsection 3 , paragraph âaâ , Code 2023. 34 Sec. 7. Section 260C.14, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 35 -2- LSB 1793XS (2) 91 jda/jh 2/ 4 S.F. 6 following new subsection: 1 NEW SUBSECTION . 26. Adopt rules that require the community 2 college to include in any communication to students that is 3 related to immunization requirements information regarding 4 exemptions to such requirements. 5 Sec. 8. Section 262.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 6 following new subsection: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 39. Direct the institutions of higher 8 education under its control to adopt a policy that requires the 9 institution to include in any communication to students that 10 is related to immunization requirements information regarding 11 exemptions to such requirements. 12 Sec. 9. STATE MANDATE FUNDING SPECIFIED. In accordance 13 with section 25B.2, subsection 3, the state cost of requiring 14 compliance with any state mandate included in this Act shall 15 be paid by a school district from state school foundation aid 16 received by the school district under section 257.16. This 17 specification of the payment of the state cost shall be deemed 18 to meet all of the state funding-related requirements of 19 section 25B.2, subsection 3, and no additional state funding 20 shall be necessary for the full implementation of this Act 21 by and enforcement of this Act against all affected school 22 districts. 23